Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 6. Offenses and Penalties

§ 22-29-601.
Violation of special district elections act.

The knowing and willful violation of any provision of the special district elections act is a misdemeanor offense punishable by not more than six (6) months in jail, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 1.